Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.40.104

Trafficking—Court may prohibit defendant's contact with victim—No-contact orders—Issuance, termination, modification—Entry of order into computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

(1) Because of the likelihood of repeated harassment and intimidation directed at those who have been victims of trafficking as described in RCW 9A.40.100, before any defendant charged with or arrested, for a crime involving trafficking, is released from custody, or at any time the case remains unresolved, the court may prohibit that person from having any contact with the victim whether directly or through third parties.

At the initial preliminary appearance, the court shall determine whether to extend any existing prohibition on the defendant's contact with the victim. If there is no outstanding restraining or protective order prohibiting that person from having contact with the victim, the court may issue, by telephone, a no-contact order prohibiting the person charged or arrested from having contact with the victim or from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within, a specified distance of a location. The court may also consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800 or other conditions of pretrial release according to the procedures established by court rule for preliminary appearance or an arraignment.

(2) At the time of arraignment the court shall determine whether a no-contact order shall be issued or extended. So long as the court finds probable cause, the court may issue or extend a no-contact order. The no-contact order shall terminate if the defendant is acquitted or the charges are dismissed.

(3)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued under this section is punishable under RCW 7.105.450.

(b) The written order shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 7.105 RCW and the violator is subject to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting, or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.

(4) Upon a motion with notice to all parties and after a hearing, the court may terminate or modify the terms of an existing no-contact order, including terms entered pursuant to RCW 9.41.800 related to firearms or other dangerous weapons or to concealed pistol licenses.

(5)(a) A defendant's motion to terminate or modify a no-contact order must include a declaration setting forth facts supporting the requested order for termination or modification. The court shall deny the motion unless it finds that adequate cause for hearing the motion is established by the declarations. If the court finds that the defendant established adequate cause, the court shall set a date for hearing the defendant's motion.

(b) The court may terminate or modify the terms of a no-contact order, including terms entered pursuant to RCW 9.41.800 related to firearms or other dangerous weapons or to concealed pistol licenses, if the defendant proves by a preponderance of the evidence that there has been a material change in circumstances such that the defendant is not likely to engage in or attempt to engage in physical or nonphysical contact with the victim if the order is terminated or modified. The victim bears no burden of proving that he or she has a current reasonable fear of harm by the defendant.

(c) A defendant may file a motion to terminate or modify pursuant to this section no more than once in every twelve-month period that the order is in effect, starting from the date of the order and continuing through any renewal.

(6) Whenever a no-contact order is issued, modified, or terminated under this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

[ 2021 c 215 s 107; 2017 c 230 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.